Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2286.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "approved course of study" and "in-demand occupation" in section 2050-L of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.945, No.89), are amended to read:Section 2050-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Approved course of study." A program offered by an institution of higher education that provides instruction in agriculture, computer science, criminal justice, business, 1234567891011121314151617181920 education, special education, STEM education, engineering, nursing, allied health, sign language interpretation and translation, trades or other programs aligned to in-demand occupations approved by the agency.* * *"In-demand occupation." A job that is in demand by employers in this Commonwealth, requires a high level of skill and is likely to provide family-sustaining wages. The term includes a job related to sign language interpretation and translation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2286PN2994 - 2 - 1234567891011